apertium-kat.kat.lexd
#### SCRAPED FROM WIKIPEDIA: needs work ####
აბაზანა:აბაზანა # "bathtub"
აბანო:აბანო # "bathroom, bathhouse"
აბანოზი:აბანოზი # "ebony"
აბაჟური:აბაჟური # "lampshade"
აბატი:აბატი # "abbot"
აბდაუბდა:აბდაუბდა # "nonsense"
აბედი:აბედი # "tinder, touchwood, amadou, canker"
აბზაცი:აბზაცი # "paragraph"
აბი:აბი # "pill"
აბლაბუდა:აბლაბუდა # "spiderweb, cobweb"
აბლაუტი:აბლაუტი # "ablaut"
აბონენტი:აბონენტი # "subscriber"
აბრაკადაბრა:აბრაკადაბრა # "abracadabra"
აბრევიატურა:აბრევიატურა # "abbreviation"
აბრეშუმი:აბრეშუმი # "silk"
აბსოლუტიზმი:აბსოლუტიზმი # "absolutism, autarchy, autarky"
აბსტრაქცია:აბსტრაქცია # "abstract, abstraction"
აბსურდულობა:აბსურდულობა # "absurdity"
აბჯარი:აბჯარი # "armour"
აგავა:აგავა # "agave"
აგარა:აგარა # "dacha"
აგარაკი:აგარაკი # "field, camp, dacha, village, field, village, garden"
აგენტი:აგენტი # "agent"
აგენტურა:აგენტურა # "espionage"
აგზნებადობა:აგზნებადობა # "excitability"
აგიტატორი:აგიტატორი # "agitator"
აგლომერაცია:აგლომერაცია # "agglomeration, conurbation"
აგნოსტიკოსი:აგნოსტიკოსი # "agnostic"
აგნოსტიციზმი:აგნოსტიციზმი # "agnosticism"
აგონია:აგონია # "agony"
აგორაფობია:აგორაფობია # "agoraphobia"
აგრესია:აგრესია # "aggression"
აგრესიულობა:აგრესიულობა # "aggressiveness"
აგრესორი:აგრესორი # "aggressor"
აგური:აგური # "brick, brick"
ადათი:ადათი # "custom"
ადამიანი:ადამიანი # "person"
ადაპტაცია:ადაპტაცია # "adaptation"
ადგილი:ადგილი # "place"
ადეკვატურობა:ადეკვატურობა # "adequacy"
ადეპტი:ადეპტი # "adept"
ადვოკატი:ადვოკატი # "lawyer"
ადიულტერი:ადიულტერი # "adultery"
ადიუტანტი:ადიუტანტი # "adjutant"
ადმინისტრატორი:ადმინისტრატორი # "administrator, admin"
ადმინისტრაცია:ადმინისტრაცია # "administration, administering"
ადრენალინი:ადრენალინი # "adrenalin"
ადრესატი:ადრესატი # "addressee"
აეროდინამიკა:აეროდინამიკა # "aerodynamics"
აეროდრომი:აეროდრომი # "aerodrome, airdrome"
აეროზოლი:აეროზოლი # "aerosol"
აეროპორტი:აეროპორტი # "airport"
აეროსტატი:აეროსტატი # "balloon"
ავადმყოფობა:ავადმყოფობა # "illness, sickness, ailment, malady"
ავაზა:ავაზა # "cheetah, hound"
ავაზაკი:ავაზაკი # "robber, brigand"
ავაზანი:ავაზანი # "pool, cauldron, basin"
ავანგარდი:ავანგარდი # "avant-garde, vanguard"
ავანპოსტი:ავანპოსტი # "outpost"
ავარია:ავარია # "wreck, breakdown"
ავეჯი:ავეჯი # "furniture"
ავზი:ავზი # "sink, tank"
ავიაკომპანია:ავიაკომპანია # "airline"
ავიატორი:ავიატორი # "aviator"
ავიაცია:ავიაცია # "aviation"
ავიახაზი:ავიახაზი # "airline, airway"
ავკაცი:ავკაცი # "evil-doer, villain"
ავლი:ავლი # "ashes, sweepings"
ავლინი:ავლინი # "dump"
ავოკადო:ავოკადო # "avocado"
ავტობიოგრაფია:ავტობიოგრაფია # "autobiography"
ავტოგრაფი:ავტოგრაფი # "autograph"
ავტოკოლონა:ავტოკოლონა # "motorcade"
ავტოკრატი:ავტოკრატი # "autocrat"
ავტოკრატია:ავტოკრატია # "autarchy, autarky"
ავტომატი:ავტომატი # "automaton"
ავტომობილი:ავტომობილი # "automobile"
ავტონომია:ავტონომია # "autonomy"
ავტორი:ავტორი # "author, authoress, originator"
ავტორიტეტი:ავტორიტეტი # "authority"
ავტორობა:ავტორობა # "authorship"
ავტოსადგომი:ავტოსადგომი # "layby, parking"
ავტოსტოპი:ავტოსტოპი # "hitchhiking"
ავტოსტრადა:ავტოსტრადა # "autobahn, autostrada, autostrade"
ავტოფობია:ავტოფობია # "autophobia"
ავყიობა:ავყიობა # "obloquy"
ავხორცობა:ავხორცობა # "lasciviousness, lewdness, prurience, pruriency, salaciousness, salacity, voluptuousness"
აზარტი:აზარტი # "passion"
აზბესტი:აზბესტი # "asbestos"
აზოტი:აზოტი # "nitrogen"
აზრი:აზრი # "opinion, thought"
აზროვნება:აზროვნება # "thought"
აზღუდი:აზღუდი # "bra"
ათასწლეული:ათასწლეული # "millennium"
ათაშანგი:ათაშანგი # "ka|სიფილისი:"
ათეიზმი:ათეიზმი # "atheism"
ათეისტი:ათეისტი # "atheist, infidel"
ათიანები:ათიანები # "tens"
ათკუთხედი:ათკუთხედი # "decagon"
ათლეტი:ათლეტი # "athlete"
ათლეტიკა:ათლეტიკა # "athletics"
ათწლეული:ათწლეული # "decade"
აივანი:აივანი # "balcony"
აინშტაინიუმი:აინშტაინიუმი # "einsteinium"
აირი:აირი # "gas"
აირღუმელი:აირღუმელი # "gas-oven"
აირწინაღი:აირწინაღი # "nosebags"
აისბერგი:აისბერგი # "berg, iceberg"
აისი:აისი # "sunrise"
აკადემია:აკადემია # "academy"
აკადემიკოსი:აკადემიკოსი # "academician"
აკაზმულობა:აკაზმულობა # "harness"
აკაჟუ:აკაჟუ # "cashew"
აკაცია:აკაცია # "acacia"
აკვალანგი:აკვალანგი # "aqualung"
აკვამარინი:აკვამარინი # "aquamarine"
აკვანი:აკვანი # "cradle"
აკვარელი:აკვარელი # "watercolour"
აკვარელისტი:აკვარელისტი # "watercolourist"
აკვარიუმი:აკვარიუმი # "aquaria, aquarium"
აკვედუკი:აკვედუკი # "aqueduct"
აკვიატება:აკვიატება # "obsession, ka|], ]:"
აკლდამა:აკლდამა # "tomb"
აკომპანირება:აკომპანირება # "accompaniment"
აკორდეონი:აკორდეონი # "accordion"
აკრი:აკრი # "acre"
აკრობატი:აკრობატი # "acrobat, contortionist, tumbler"
აკრობატიკა:აკრობატიკა # "acrobatics"
აკროპოლისი:აკროპოლისი # "acropolis"
აკროსტიქი:აკროსტიქი # "acrostic"
აკროფობია:აკროფობია # "acrophobia"
აკუმულატორი:აკუმულატორი # "accumulator"
აკურატულობა:აკურატულობა # "neatness, orderliness"
აკუსტიკა:აკუსტიკა # "acoustic, acoustics, phonics"
ალაგი:ალაგი # "place, service, job"
ალავერდი:ალავერდი # "lucerne"
ალალმართლობა:ალალმართლობა # "veracity"
ალამი:ალამი # "flag"
ალაო:ალაო # "malt"
ალაფი:ალაფი # "booty, trophy"
ალბათობა:ალბათობა # "likelihood, probability"
ალბატროსი:ალბატროსი # "albatross"
ალბინოსი:ალბინოსი # "albino"
ალბომი:ალბომი # "album, album"
ალგებრა:ალგებრა # "algebra"
ალგორითმი:ალგორითმი # "algorithm"
ალებასტრი:ალებასტრი # "alabaster"
ალეგორია:ალეგორია # "allegory"
ალერგია:ალერგია # "allergy"
ალერსი:ალერსი # "caress, endearment"
ალი:ალი # "blaze, flame, fire"
ალიაქოთი:ალიაქოთი # "bustle, charivari, hurly-burly, topsy-turvydom, tumult, turmoil, welter"
ალიგატორი:ალიგატორი # "alligator"
ალიზი:ალიზი # "brick"
ალიკაპი:ალიკაპი # "gag"
ალიონი:ალიონი # "sunrise, dawn, daybreak"
ალიტერაცია:ალიტერაცია # "alliteration"
ალკოჰოლი:ალკოჰოლი # "alcohol"
ალკოჰოლიზმი:ალკოჰოლიზმი # "alcoholism, dipsomania, inebriety"
ალკუნი:ალკუნი # "kingfisher, halcyon"
ალმანახი:ალმანახი # "almanac"
ალმასი:ალმასი # "adamant, diamond"
ალმური:ალმური # "blush"
ალოე:ალოე # "aloe"
ალპინიზმი:ალპინიზმი # "mountaineering"
ალპინისტი:ალპინისტი # "alpinist, climber, iceman, mountaineer"
ალტერნატივა:ალტერნატივა # "alternative"
ალტი:ალტი # "alto, viola"
ალტიმეტრი:ალტიმეტრი # "altimeter"
ალტრუიზმი:ალტრუიზმი # "altruism"
ალტრუისტი:ალტრუისტი # "altruist"
ალუმინი:ალუმინი # "aluminium"
ალფა:ალფა # "alpha"
ალქიმია:ალქიმია # "alchemy"
ალქიმიკოსი:ალქიმიკოსი # "alchemist"
ალღო:ალღო # "feel, flair"
ალყა:ალყა # "siege, circle, arc"
ამალა:ამალა # "suite"
ამალგამა:ამალგამა # "amalgam"
ამანათი:ამანათი # "package, parcel"
ამაოება:ამაოება # "futility, vanities, vanity"
ამარილისი:ამარილისი # "amaryllis, belladonna"
ამაღლებულობა:ამაღლებულობა # "sublimity"
ამბავი:ამბავი # "news, story, narrative, yarn"
ამბარჩა:ამბარჩა # "necklace"
ამბიცია:ამბიცია # "ambition"
ამბოხება:ამბოხება # "uprising"
ამბოხი:ამბოხი # "rebellion, uprising, insurrection, insurgency"
ამბრაზურა:ამბრაზურა # "loophole"
ამება:ამება # "amoeba"
ამეთვისტო:ამეთვისტო # "amethyst"
ამერიციუმი:ამერიციუმი # "americium"
ამიაკი:ამიაკი # "ammonia"
ამინდი:ამინდი # "weather"
ამირა:ამირა # "ameer, amir"
ამირი:ამირი # "amir, emir"
ამნეზია:ამნეზია # "amnesia"
ამნისტია:ამნისტია # "amnesty"
ამოზნექილობა:ამოზნექილობა # "bulge, camber, convexity, salience"
ამომრჩეველი:ამომრჩეველი # "voter"
ამორტიზაცია:ამორტიზაცია # "amortization"
ამოფრქვევა:ამოფრქვევა # "eruption, effusion, ejection, eructation, ka|ამოაფრქვევს:, ka|ამოიფრქვევა:"
ამოცანა:ამოცანა # "task, problem, object, objective, aim, goal, mission, end"
ამოცნობა:ამოცნობა # "discernment"
ამპერი:ამპერი # "ampere"
ამპერმეტრი:ამპერმეტრი # "ammeter"
ამპლიტუდა:ამპლიტუდა # "amplitude"
ამპულა:ამპულა # "ampoule"
ამპუტაცია:ამპუტაცია # "amputation"
ამტანობა:ამტანობა # "endurance, stamina"
ამუზია:ამუზია # "amusia"
ამულეტი:ამულეტი # "amulet"
ამფიბია:ამფიბია # "amphibian"
ამფითეატრი:ამფითეატრი # "amphitheatre"
ამფორა:ამფორა # "amphora"
ამღვრეულობა:ამღვრეულობა # "turbidity, turbidness"
ამწე:ამწე # "crane"
ამხანაგი:ამხანაგი # "comrade, fellow, mate"
ამხანაგობა:ამხანაგობა # "comradeship, copartnership, fellowship, good-fellowship"
ანაბარი:ანაბარი # "holding, deposit"
ანაბეჭდი:ანაბეჭდი # "impress, imprint, print"
ანათემა:ანათემა # "anathema"
ანაკონდა:ანაკონდა # "anaconda"
ანალიზი:ანალიზი # "analysis"
ანალიტიკა:ანალიტიკა # "analytics"
ანალიტიკოსი:ანალიტიკოსი # "analyst"
ანალოგი:ანალოგი # "analog, analogue"
ანალოგია:ანალოგია # "analogy"
ანანასი:ანანასი # "pineapple"
ანარქია:ანარქია # "anarchy"
ანარქიზმი:ანარქიზმი # "anarchism"
ანარქისტი:ანარქისტი # "anarchist"
ანატომი:ანატომი # "anatomist"
ანაფილაქსია:ანაფილაქსია # "anaphylaxis<!--"
ანაფორა:ანაფორა # "cassock"
ანაქრონიზმი:ანაქრონიზმი # "anachronism"
ანბანი:ანბანი # "alphabet, primer"
ანგარება:ანგარება # "self-interest"
ანგარი:ანგარი # "hangar, avaricious, greedy"
ანგარიშვალდებულება:ანგარიშვალდებულება # "accountability"
ანგარიში:ანგარიში # "account, report, result"
ანგელოზა:ანგელოზა # "angelica"
ანგელოზი:ანგელოზი # "angel"
ანგინა:ანგინა # "angina, quinsy"
ანგლიციზმი:ანგლიციზმი # "anglicism"
ანდაზა:ანდაზა # "proverb"
ანდამატი:ანდამატი # "magnet, diamond"
ანეკდოტი:ანეკდოტი # "anecdote"
ანემია:ანემია # "anaemia"
ანესთეზია:ანესთეზია # "anesthesia"
ანექსია:ანექსია # "annexation"
ანთება:ანთება # "ka|აანთებს:"
ანთოლოგია:ანთოლოგია # "anthology"
ანთრაციტი:ანთრაციტი # "anthracite"
ანთროპოიდი:ანთროპოიდი # "anthropoid"
ანთროპოლოგი:ანთროპოლოგი # "anthropologist"
ანიმე:ანიმე # "anime"
ანიმიზმი:ანიმიზმი # "animism"
ანისული:ანისული # "anise"
ანკესი:ანკესი # "fishhook, hook, angle"
ანკეტა:ანკეტა # "questionnaire"
ანომალია:ანომალია # "anomaly"
ანონიმურობა:ანონიმურობა # "anonymity"
ანონსი:ანონსი # "advertisement, announcement"
ანოტაცია:ანოტაცია # "annotation"
ანტაგონიზმი:ანტაგონიზმი # "antagonism"
ანტენა:ანტენა # "antenna"
ანტიბიოტიკი:ანტიბიოტიკი # "antibiotic"
ანტიგმირი:ანტიგმირი # "anti-hero"
ანტიიმპერიალიზმი:ანტიიმპერიალიზმი # "anti-imperialism"
ანტიკვარი:ანტიკვარი # "antiquarian, antiquary"
ანტიკომუნისტი:ანტიკომუნისტი # "anticommunist"
ანტიკურობა:ანტიკურობა # "antiquity"
ანტილოპა:ანტილოპა # "antelope"
ანტიპათია:ანტიპათია # "antipathy, aversion, dislike"
ანტისემიტიზმი:ანტისემიტიზმი # "antisemitism"
ანტისხეული:ანტისხეული # "antibody"
ანტიფაშისტი:ანტიფაშისტი # "antifascist"
ანტიფედერალიზმი:ანტიფედერალიზმი # "anti-federalism"
ანტიფედერალისტი:ანტიფედერალისტი # "anti-federalist"
ანტიციკლონი:ანტიციკლონი # "anticyclone"
ანტონიმი:ანტონიმი # "antonym"
ანტრაქტი:ანტრაქტი # "entr'acte, interlude"
ანტრესოლი:ანტრესოლი # "mezzanine"
ანტურაჟი:ანტურაჟი # "entourage"
ანძა:ანძა # "mast"
ანწლი:ანწლი # "elder"
ანჯამა:ანჯამა # "hinge"
აორისტი:აორისტი # "aorist"
აორტა:აორტა # "aorta"
აპათია:აპათია # "ennui"
აპარატი:აპარატი # "apparatus, mechanism, apparatus, appliance, instrument, machine, device, organs, system, apparatus, machine"
აპარტეიდი:აპარტეიდი # "apartheid"
აპენდიქსი:აპენდიქსი # "appendix"
აპენდიციტი:აპენდიციტი # "appendicitis"
აპლოდისმენტი:აპლოდისმენტი # "applause"
აპლომბი:აპლომბი # "aplomb"
აპოგეა:აპოგეა # "apogee"
აპოკალიფსი:აპოკალიფსი # "apocalypse"
აპოლოგეტი:აპოლოგეტი # "apologist"
აპოლოგეტიკა:აპოლოგეტიკა # "apologetics"
არაბინარული:არაბინარული # "non-binary, genderqueer"
არათითი:არათითი # "ring-finger"
არაკი:არაკი # "fable"
არალეგიტიმურობა:არალეგიტიმურობა # "illegitimacy, unlawfulness"
არამზადა:არამზადა # "swindler, scoundrel, villain"
არამორწმუნე:არამორწმუნე # "nonbeliever"
არამყარობა:არამყარობა # "destructibility, shakiness"
არანაირად:არანაირად # "ka|არანაირი||adv|s:"
არაპროფესიონალი:არაპროფესიონალი # "unprofessional"
არარაობა:არარაობა # "nullity, whippersnapper"
არარეალობა:არარეალობა # "unreality"
არარსებობა:არარსებობა # "deficiency, non-existence:"
არასამართლიანობა:არასამართლიანობა # "unjustness, injustice"
არაუკუქცევადობა:არაუკუქცევადობა # "irreversibility"
არაფერს:არაფერს # "ka|არაფერი||dat|s:"
არაფრის:არაფრის # "ka|არაფერი||gs:"
არაქათი:არაქათი # "stamina, strength"
არაქისი:არაქისი # "peanut"
არაყი:არაყი # "vodka"
არახჩინი:არახჩინი # "skullcap"
არბიტრი:არბიტრი # "moderator"
არგამოყენება:არგამოყენება # "disuse"
არგონი:არგონი # "argon"
არგუმენტაცია:არგუმენტაცია # "argumentation"
არგუმენტი:არგუმენტი # "argument"
არდადეგები:არდადეგები # "vacation"
არე:არე # "area"
არენა:არენა # "arena"
არეულდარეულობა:არეულდარეულობა # "disorder"
